Massachusetts, session 194th, H894.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 6 of chapter 44B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 6, the word “and”.
SECTION 2. Section 6 of chapter 44B of the General Laws,as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “housing”, in line 7, the
following words:-
"and in coastal communities that adopt the provisions of this act, not less than 10 per cent
for the preservation of public infrastructure through beach nourishment, dune restoration, and
seawall maintenance and reconstruction."
of 1